_	A Bench of three Judges of the Supreme Court of India upholds the Court’s order dated 8 March 2010 with the proviso that interest to be paid from 1.1.2006, the date when the first of several writ petitions were filed by affected Armed Forces officers, instead of 1 January 1986, the date on which rank-pay was implemented.
_	Grissell died in Rome on 10 June 1907, leaving his relic collection in trust to the Catholic Archdiocese of Birmingham, with the proviso that it be housed within a special chapel within the church of St. Aloysius Gonzaga in Oxford.
_	The tone of the meeting changed however when Mr Lambert and Mr Harkness spoke in favour of union, with the proviso that Mr. Wotherspoon should by the Secretary of the unified Society.
_	Kneale agreed, on the proviso that it would be a totally new concept unrelated to the first two films, which he had not seen and he did not like what he had heard about them.
_	With the decline in cigarette sales, the warehouse was presented to the Dundalk Urban District Council in 1989 on the proviso that it be used as an interpretative centre.
_	William Jardine agreed to make them agents for Jardines with the proviso that "At no time shall it be expedient that we should give up the option of carrying on transactions with other London houses."
_	Bristol's earlier work had shown the sort of performance that the Brabazon Committee has been looking for, and thus the Committee authorised the firm to proceed with preliminary work towards designing such an aircraft that year, on the proviso that work on wartime aircraft was not disrupted by the project.
_	Earlier, in 1813, Jarvis had deeded land in Weathersfield to the local school district with the proviso that the Jarvis family could use some portion of the land as their family burial ground in perpetuity.
_	As part of the Massachusetts Turnpike Boston Extension's construction in the 1960s, the Worcester Line's roadbed between Route 128 and Boston was sold to the Massachusetts Turnpike Authority, with the proviso that the control of the railroad remain with NYC.
_	In 1971 the home was given to the Oceana County Historical & Genealogical Society on the proviso that it be turned into a museum in memory of newspaper publisher Swift Lathers.
_	Included in the agreement was the proviso that the original 1939 airport terminal building would be dissembled and moved from the airport to an undetermined location, to be turned over to a third party, at Port Authority expense.
_	He left the whole of his residuary estate to the Pukeiti Rhododendron Trust - with the proviso that "if it could survive for more than 20 years it deserved to have the land."
_	The Melkbosrand area, consisting of the farms or areas known as Hartebeesvlak, Blousyfer and Wabrand that cover the northern side of the Augrabies Gorge and the Augrabies Falls National Park, was deproclaimed by parliament, withdrawing it from the national park, with the proviso that it be used for community-based eco-tourism and conservation.
_	A breakthrough was achieved in 1972, with a funding of 42 million lire approved, on the proviso that the line be extended to connect Naples central railway station.
_	Twenty compulsory subjects were set forth, with the proviso that only at the University of Belgrade Faculty of Law, under the same conditions as before, Sharia Law was taught as an additional subject.
_	An additional eleven members were allocated by a London wide top-up vote, with the proviso that parties must win at least 5% of the vote to qualify for list seats.
_	He made the gift on the proviso that the people of Auckland raise 10,000 pounds for the Belgium Relief Fund.
_	Members of Sejm are elected by proportional representation, with the proviso that non-ethnic-minority parties must gain at least 5% of the national vote to enter the lower house.
_	The bicyclic semigroup is the free semigroup on two generators "p" and "q", under the relation "p" "q" = 1. That is, each semigroup element is a string of those two letters, with the proviso that the subsequence ""p" "q"" does not appear.
_	In 1374, but with the proviso that they find a dining room of their own, away from the canons.
_	Keeper liability has been introduced by Government on the proviso that the parking profession provides the motorist with an Independent Appeals Service (IAS), and that the service will be funded by the industry.
_	These can be seen at distances on the order thousands of miles, with the proviso that they would be below the horizon for a ground-based sensor and thus require sensors being located in orbit.
_	The £959,300 contract went to C & E Millar of Melbourne on the proviso that they could use coolie labour.
_	She was offered a contract by ITV to make a documentary and a consumer show on the proviso that she left her studies.
_	In this version, disputed by other commentators, Saddam funded Al-Qaeda operatives to move into Iraq with the proviso that they would not undermine his regime.
_	An entity from his prison dimension reverses the aging process and removes the mystical powers on the proviso that the villain never return.
_	Indeed, the tax of 1380 varied within narrower limits - from twenty shillings to fourpence (or sixty groats to three), with the proviso that the strong should aid the weak.
_	Access to the WPA for non-Defence use requires Commonwealth approval and is on the proviso that Defence activities will not be unduly compromised.
_	Eventually, the project was able to purchase land from the City Council with the proviso that an existing listed building be preserved and used.
_	The trophy was subsequently stored at the headquarters of the "Sporting Life" for several years until 1969 when it was presented to the Polytechnic Harriers in perpetuity with the proviso that the club "the best means and method that will fulfill the original purpose of the trophy"; the original purpose being to "encourage long distance running in Great Britain".
_	Queen Victoria gave her permission for the marriage with the proviso that the couple live in Great Britain.
_	This was on the proviso that team manager Jean-René Bernaudeau could find a primary sponsor that would allow Bouygues Telecom to contribute €1 million to the team's budget, but the rest of its finances would be covered by an incoming sponsor.
_	Part of this land was purchased by Northumbrian Water for a water treatment works with the proviso that some of the land would be set aside and managed as a nature reserve.
_	His commitment to internationalist ideals was in the tradition of Woodrow Wilson, architect of the failed League of Nations, and led to his support for the establishment of the United Nations, with the proviso that the U.S. would have a veto power.
_	After negotiations however, a deal is struck − 200 liters of deuterium for four power cells and whatever medical supplies "Enterprise" can spare, on the proviso that the "Enterprise" crew can fix two offline pumps in two days.
_	This is qualified by the proviso that they can be defended against objections (this differentiates this view from fideism).
_	We have made jury members of "Big Brother" available to the press the past few seasons always with the proviso that their questions not inform the ejected HouseGuest of influences outside his or her personal experience in the House.
_	Big Brother did this with the proviso that she will be blindfolded during the trip and that she cannot speak to anyone except those who were investigating her.
_	The Society of Clifford's Inn concluded purchase of the freehold of the property on 29 March 1618 from its then owner, Francis Clifford, 4th Earl of Cumberland, for the sum of £600, with the proviso that it should pay him £4 per year rent thereafter for use of the land and to keep a set of chambers available for those barristers of his choosing.
_	Alexander VI confirmed Christopher as coadjutor under the proviso that he should only ascend to office having come of age (27 years), which was in 1514.
_	A new town including parts of Lancaster, Groton, and Stow was incorporated in 1732, subject to the proviso that the inhabitants "Settle a learned and Orthodox Minister among them within the space of two years and also erect an House for the publick Worship of God."
_	Two equal second prizes were awarded, to the work of Živko Piperski and Jovan Jovanović, and to the work of Bogdan Nestorović and Jovan Šnajder, and the final right for the realisation was given to Piperski and Jovanović, with the proviso that they should bring it into harmony with the design of Nestorović and Šnajder.
_	Here he explores the idea of Śūnyatā, which cannot be "called void or not void; or both or neither" but can be referred to as 'the Void' with, again, the proviso that it exists beyond the limit of language.
_	In early 2009, the collection, estimated to be worth in excess of US$40 million, was placed for sale by Sotheby's, with the proviso that it be sold as a whole and not broken up, and remain accessible to scholars.
_	In 1986 it was revealed in "Business Review Weekly" that the Country Liberal Party Government of the Northern Territory facilitated loans to Pendarvis with the proviso that he sue the union for damages.
_	The town had given it the property with the proviso that it operate it as a museum, and arguments were made that the historical society was therefore not permitted to sell it.
_	It has the same mathematical character as Coulomb's Law with the proviso that like currents attract and unlike currents repel.
_	In 1986, Middlesbrough faced with liquidation were locked out of their ground, Ayresome Park, and the authorities had granted Middlesbrough continued League status on the proviso that they could fulfil their first fixture of the season.
_	This was granted, on the proviso that should a company subsequently express interest, and make a reasonable offer for the cars and associated plant, then Huddersfield would cease to operate the system.
_	Jenkins' contract with Glidrose gave him a licence to reuse the material in the novel in the event of its rejection, with the proviso that he could not use any of Fleming's characters.
_	Ormond, who had donated the majority of funds towards the foundation of Ormond College at the University of Melbourne, offered £5,000 towards the establishment of a college on the proviso that the public contribute a "like sum".
_	In his review for Starburst, Callum Shephard said that it was "a good guide" with the proviso that "It's distinctly weaker when it comes to covering handheld gaming and some titles are definitely under-represented."
_	An additional eleven members are allocated by a London wide top-up vote with the proviso that parties must win at least five percent of the vote to qualify for the list seats.
_	The ground is not owned by the Clarence United FC, but is a Clarence City Council facility who lease the ground to the club on a long-term basis on the proviso that other sports be permitted to share the facilities with Clarence United FC.
_	The loan was extended with the proviso that a Financial Advisor from the court of Siam be accepted and a State Council be created to assist the Sultan in the administration of all public affairs.
_	It was stipulated that the monastery would be free from local authorities, lay or ecclesiastical, and subject only to the Pope, with the proviso that even he could not seize the property, divide or give it to someone else or appoint an abbot without the consent of the monks.
_	Wanting more education, he was accepted as the first black student at Yale University, though with the proviso that he must sit in the back of the room and not ask questions.
_	An opinion poll conducted shortly after the election showed that 65% of SPD members were opposed to entering a Merkel-led grand coalition, however the SPD executive voted to enter coalition talks with the proviso that they would seek a vote from their membership before making a final agreement on entering a coalition.
_	In 1527, he was granted the newly discovered Province of Venezuela, with the proviso that he conquer the country at his own expense, enlist only Spanish and Flemish troops, fit out two expeditions of four vessels, and build two cities and three forts within two years after taking possession.
_	The contents were bequeathed to the museum by Miss Jennie Mateer Hunter, a local rancher and daughter of San Joaquin County pioneers, with the proviso that they be displayed as they had been arranged in her home.
_	It was placed alongside "B. laevigata", but with the proviso that "we have perceived a close relationship between "Banksia laevigata" and "Banksia rosserae" which a more informed study may find superficial."
_	Henry Fownes (c. 1722 – 1780), who married the heiress Margaret Luttrell (1726–1766) and under his father-in-law's will inherited the Luttrell estates including Dunster Castle, with the proviso that he should adopt the surname and arms of Luttrell.
_	His serious concerns about the theory of evolution had been resolved by the proviso that he only needed to carry out research.
_	In part, as a reaction to the rapid cutting of trees and the burning that was taking place, the Garrett Brothers, in 1906 gave 2000 acres to the state with the proviso that an agency would be created to manage the property and to institute scientific forestry- this led to the birth of the Maryland Forest Service.
_	The first endowed chair at Cornell was the Professorship of Hebrew and Oriental Literature and History donated by New York City financier Joseph Seligman in 1874, with the proviso that he (Seligman) would nominate the chairholder; and following his wishes, Dr. Felix Adler (Society for Ethical Culture), was appointed.
_	The Bolton & Preston Act was passed on 15 July 1837 with the proviso that the line north of Chorley should be delayed for three years so that a compromise could be reached between the two companies about running trains into Preston.
_	His father agreed on the proviso that Charles paid for the materials he used.
_	Roush brought the song to a group that he booked around West Texas, the Cavaliers of San Angelo, with the proviso that singer J. Frank Wilson was still with the band.
_	On 14 May 2007 the AFL and Port Adelaide reached an agreement whereby the club could wear its traditional guernsey in the heritage round, with the proviso that in future seasons its players can only wear it in home heritage round games and provided that such a game is not against Collingwood.
_	In 2009, he won a 20-game combined match (four classical, four rapid and twelve blitz games) against Anatoly Karpov, played with the proviso that each game be played to mate or dead draw.
_	In 1779, he sent his nephew (John Taylor, and afterwards his brother Henry), "for the best school education in England (at any expence) preparative to his becoming in time a good man and a compleat distiller," adding the proviso that "none of his time be murdered in Latin".
_	At the time the colonial government decided to implement a national railway gauge, they made exceptions for some existing railway systems that had already been laid using different gauges, generally on the proviso that any new track was to the national gauge.
_	The fund agreed to invest $4.5 million with the proviso that Milner and Finger each personally invest $750,000.
_	Hobson claimed the jewels had been taken to Amsterdam by Shackleton, and pledged for £20,000, with the proviso that they not be broken up for three years.
_	When John Poole and Thomas Lester Donnelly rented it in 1876, it was with the proviso that "a small percentage of the profits should go to the Erie Railway company".
_	Sullivan's acceptance came with the proviso that "we are thoroughly agreed upon the subject."
_	Nothing further was done until 1463, when Abbot Thomas Mynde was allowed by the Pope, in response to a letter from his predecessor Abbot Ludlow, to earmark the tithes of Great Ness for the project, with the proviso that enough remain to support a vicar in the parish.
_	Storm Shadow strikes a deal with Destro to aid the Joes, with the proviso that when Cobra is defeated Destro will turn himself over to the authorities.
_	Fenaille agreed but with the proviso that he and his children has the right to live there for the rest of their lives.
_	Article VII, Section 6 of the 1972 constitution permitted the state legislature to determine the number of judicial districts, with the proviso that each district be composed only of whole counties, and that each county in the district be adjacent.
_	She accepted on the proviso that the Queen be informed before her Royal tour in February 1990, and that the leader of the opposition be informed.
_	The APCA Educational Committee voted to organize a separate corporation to administer the new school, with the proviso that it would be dependent upon the APCA.
_	When Anette died of cancer in 1999, her husband Udo donated the collection to the state of Bavaria on the proviso that the state build it a fitting home.
_	Hedberg quickly solved the problem: he contacted the manager of an NBC affiliate in a nearby community, KYSM in Mankato, MN, and asked if KBEW could have authority to re-broadcast its network news; NBC Radio agreed to this extraordinary request (with the proviso that KBEW would carry NBC's advertisements but, given the gravity of the unfolding situation, NBC ran no commercials anyway).
_	We have made jury members of "Big Brother" available to the press the past few seasons always with the proviso that their questions not inform the ejected HouseGuest of influences outside his or her personal experience in the House.
_	With the new 2010 City statute, they were all given equal status, with the proviso that suburban ones (except Surčin) have certain autonomous powers, chiefly related with construction, infrastructure and public utilities.
_	For the exchange to be truly voluntary "the proviso that is needed is whether to enter into any exchange at all."
_	He accepted with the proviso that he was to be released each year for a spell of musical study in Germany.
_	In 1970 an agreement to sell the property to the park service was achieved with the proviso that it would be "managed as a living ranch" by the National Park Service.
_	The offer, however, made to all surviving veterans of the International Brigades, was accompanied by the proviso that the veterans would have to renounce their own nationalities, which few were prepared to do.
_	First, legislators devised their own compromise language that banned same-sex marriage and permitted civil unions with the proviso that same-sex civil unions would not qualify as marriages for federal purposes.
_	John Locke stated that whenever labour is mixed with natural resources, such as is the case with improved land, private property is justified under the proviso that there must be enough other natural resources of the same quality available to others.
_	He devised offensive plans for 7th Armoured and 2nd New Zealand Divisions, though still under the proviso that they would not incur losses that would jeopardise further offensives.
_	Then, in 1991, following the collapse of the Soviet Union and the Independence of Kyrgyzstan, the local authority once again gave the building back to the church, with the proviso that all further restorations were their responsibility.
_	The command for returning to text mode, known as TEXT in other versions, is simply TEX, and carries the proviso that it has to be the last statement in a program line.
_	The possibility has been alluded to officially, with the proviso that the Saadé family would keep control.
_	Each church body had one representative on the council for every 100,000 confirmed members or one-third fraction thereof, with the proviso that each church body would have at least one representative.
_	Despite the economical woes the country was going through at the time, especially the Basque people, 52.6% of the total €211 million (£178 million) cost of the stadium was paid by public institution - some by the Basque Government (€50m), some by the Bilbao City Council (€11m) and some by the Biscay Provincial Council (€50m including land), as well as Athletic (€50m including land) and BBK/Kutxabank (€50m), on the proviso that the stadium would include facilities for use by the public such as a sports centre.
_	He then went on with a summary of the proviso that was more accurate, “For anybody who has ever been a Catholic in any shape or form, that is it, they are out; they count as dead for these purposes."
_	Lowell accepted the appointment, with the proviso that he should have a year of study abroad.
_	His eventual departure from Victoria Park to coach Footscray came with the blessing of the Collingwood committee, but only on the proviso that he did not continue as a player.
_	Halifax was told to take the job by Churchill, with the proviso that he could still attend meetings of the War Cabinet when he was home on leave in London.
_	The state legislature endorsed the fair, with the proviso that it would produce at least four permanent buildings, and that any state monetary contribution would be focused mainly on those buildings.
_	Included in the original lease conditions was the proviso that Bishop's House had to be restored and opened to the public.
_	The £959,300 contract was awarded to C&E Millar of Melbourne on the proviso that they could use coolie labour.
_	Caesar pardoned all the republicans, Afranius included—on the proviso that they did not join up with the republicans still at large.
_	Soon tensions arose with the local authorities, and he was given a license to depart Salem in March 1638, along with several others, with the proviso that he would be summoned if not gone by a court date in May.
_	The problems relating to the chapel were not resolved until 1372 when a charter dated 4th and 5 October stating that the Abbot and the Vicar of Townstal assented to its consecration at the expense of the parishioners who were also to bear the cost of services, with the proviso that if it was neglected in favour of the mother church at Townstal, then it would be closed.
_	Once fully qualified in 1920 he turned professional, becoming Bill Struth's first signing as manager of Rangers, but only on the proviso that he could maintain his position as a mining engineer.
_	In the event, the British Caledonian Group's controlling shareholder 3i decided to accept BA's final £250 million which it presented on 21 December 1987 with the proviso that it needed to be accepted or rejected that day.
_	The agreement also included the proviso that Spain would retain shares in the Bu Craa mining enterprise.
_	Thunderbolt gave the permission on the proviso that he travel south, away from Uralla and the police.
_	After the war Jenner Park was bought by the Welsh Greyhound Association (WGA) £5,000 with the proviso that football could continue.
_	With rehearsals for "Pirata" underway in late December, Bellini was given notice by Lanari that it was doubtful whether Pacini would be present in time to stage an opera and that a contract was to be prepared for Bellini to provide a new opera but with the proviso that it would only become effective on 14 January.
_	Then he got young, bright professionals to manage these GLCs, giving them wide latitude to run these huge corporations but with the proviso that they did not line their own pockets.
_	He agreed on the proviso that his work load would be small.
_	She was given time off school to pursue her modelling, with the proviso that she keep her grades up.
_	He inherited the County Longford estates of his uncle the Rev. Cutts Harman, with the proviso that he would adopt the Harman surname (thus becoming Laurence Harman Harman).
_	The meeting had been arranged with the proviso that these were working-class women representing their class.
_	He bequeathed his lands, including Bellevue Plantation, a few slaves, out buildings, tenements, appurtenances, all physical property, including the townhouses owned in St. Marys, cash and bonds, to his wife, Isabella Maria Floyd, with the proviso that nothing was to be sold during her lifetime unless it was for payment of debts, and after her death, all property would revert into the Estate.
_	It was carried out by Adrian Cooper-Grigg and Andrew Protheroe, with the proviso that they should attempt to create an English country house that resembled the seat of a well established family with their objects accumulated over successive generations.
_	The petition was denied on March 13 with the proviso that Ipswich, Rowley and Newbury were allowed use of the island, which became a pasture for hogs, cattle and horses.
_	The Air Ministry ordered a prototype with the proviso that it should have a more familiar fabric covered and gauze windowed fuselage of tubular construction.
_	The winners of these games then played to decide the Premiership, with the proviso that if the ultimate winner was not the Minor Premiers, then a final challenge match could be played.
_	The acceptance rate rose to 55.6% on the proviso that the HKSAR Government would propose democratising the nominating committee after the planned second phase of public consultation.
_	The character of Mole was originally to be played by Stephen Fry, but shortly before the recording session, Fry became unavailable, and Alan Bennett stepped in on the proviso that he would step aside should Fry become available.
_	The hours of work must be specified, and from Monday to Friday may be between 6 A.M. and 6 P.M., or 7 A.M. to 7 P.M.; in non-textile factories and workshops the hours also may be taken between 8 A.M. and 8 P.M. or by order of the secretary of state for special industries 9 A.M. to 9 P.M. Between these outside limits, with the proviso that mealtimes must be fixed and limits as to spells observed, women and young persons may be employed the full-time, children on the contrary only half time, on alternate days, or in alternate sets attending school half time regularly.
_	Tim jokingly agreed on the proviso that he become a member, which Neil apparently took literally.
_	The application was granted by the Commission, with the proviso that supervisors should be represented by a different organisation to the workers they supervised.
_	In 1726 he married Margaret Trevelyan, daughter of Sir John Trevelyan, 2nd Baronet of Nettlecombe, Somerset, by whom he had a daughter and sole heiress Margaret Luttrell (1726–1766), who married Henry Fownes (c. 1722 – 1780), who under his father-in-law's will inherited the Luttrell estates including Dunster Castle, with the proviso that he should adopt the surname and arms of Luttrell.
_	The meeting had been with the proviso that these were working class women representing their class.
_	Wallace permits Lipsky to tape-record their conversations, with the proviso that Lipsky won't use any direct quotes which Wallace asks to have taken "off the record" five minutes later.
_	These were organised on 14 February and on 21 February they were pledged £2000 for the operation, with the proviso that looting in Shrewsbury would result in execution under martial law.
_	Section 1.2 of the Industrial Common Ownership Act authorised the Secretary of State for Industry to make grants and loans to bodies "constituted for the purpose of encouraging the development of common ownership enterprises or co-operative enterprises" up to a total of £250,000 over a period of five years, with the proviso that grants should not exceed £30,000 in any year.
_	The site was sold to the GRA in 1937, with the proviso that it had to be used for greyhound racing.
_	The struggle of the "parlement" against the incapacity of Brienne ended on 8 May in its consenting to an edict for its own abolition, with the proviso that the Estates-General should be summoned to remedy the disorders of the state.
_	(The ω-complete forms of real elements of "S" are in one-to-one correspondence with the reals obtained by Dedekind cuts, under the proviso that Dedekind reals corresponding to rational numbers are represented by the form in which the cut point is omitted from both left and right sets.)
_	The same criterion applies to products of arbitrary complex numbers (including negative reals) if the logarithm is understood as a fixed branch of logarithm which satisfies ln(1) = 0, with the proviso that the infinite product diverges when infinitely many "a" fall outside the domain of ln, whereas finitely many such "a" can be ignored in the sum.
_	Acting on a recommendation by the Secretary-General Boutros Boutros-Ghali, the Council authorised the establishment of UNMIH for an initial period of six months, subject to the proviso that it would be extended beyond the seventy-five days upon a review by the Council on whether progress had been made.
_	Baxter in turn deeded the land to the state with the proviso that it: "shall forever be used for public park and recreational purposes, shall be forever left in the natural wild state, shall forever be kept as a sanctuary for wild beasts and birds, that no road or ways for motor vehicles shall hereafter ever be constructed thereon or therein."
_	In March of that year he passed a law opening the island to settlement by fishermen with the proviso that they would catch and cure anchovies and sell them in Livorno.
_	Sport & Leisure F.C. was founded in 1978 when a group of players approached a local Belfast businessman to provide a kit for their new team and he agreed, with the proviso that his company name, Ulster Sport & Leisure Club, appeared on the shirts.
_	Meanwhile, Busby has persuaded Football League administrator Alan Hardaker to allow his team to play in the European Cup with the proviso that they are back in time for each scheduled fixture.
_	Hitcham died the following year, leaving the castle and the manor to Pembroke College in Cambridge, with the proviso that the college destroy the internal castle buildings and construct a poorhouse on the site instead, operating under the terms of the recently passed Poor Law.
_	The meeting had been arranged by Annie Kenney and Flora Drummond with the proviso that these were working class women representing their class.
_	Governor Douglas placed restrictions on immigration to the new British colony, including the proviso that entry to the territory must be made via Victoria and not overland, but thousands of men still arrived via the Okanagan and Whatcom Trails.
_	He accepted on the proviso that his wages be increased for the show's entire run and not just until a new dancing instructor was found.
_	The palace passed into the hands of the Greater London Council in 1967, with the proviso that it should be used entirely for charitable purposes, and their trusteeship was transferred to Haringey council in 1980.
_	The second criterion is on the proviso that at least twelve years have passed and that they are no longer a sitting MP.
_	Progressive rock is a radio station programming format that emerged in the late 1960s, in which disc jockeys are given wide latitude in what they may play, similar to the freeform format but with the proviso that some kind of rock music is almost always played.
_	The Ghost Club records were deposited in the British Museum under the proviso that they would remain closed until 1962 out of respect for confidentiality.
_	The committee for reconsidering this issue was set up and finally agreed that the Faculty should be continued on the proviso that its admission and curriculum must be revamped.
_	The ("dynamic") infinitive is used instead of the indicative mood, with substantial difference in meaning, in certain subordinate clauses introduced by specific conjunctions: "so as to, so that", () "before" or "until" and relative adjectives introducing relative clauses of result, such as "so much as enough to", "of such a short as to", or "(so...) that he could", in clauses introduced by the prepositional phrases or or with "with the proviso that".
_	Finally, Pericles proposed to reimburse the city for all questionable expenses from his private property, with the proviso that he would make the inscriptions of dedication in his own name.
_	Judge Kent submitted his resignation on June 2, 2009, with the proviso that it won't take effect for a full year.
_	On 3 February 2014, the city board of Espoo decided to propose to the city council constructing a continuation of the new line to Kivenlahti, with the proviso that the Finnish state would commit to paying 30% of the construction costs.
_	On June 4, 2015, the US FDA Advisory Committee, which includes the Bone, Reproductive, and Urologic Drugs Advisory Committee (BRUDAC) and the Drug Safety and Risk Management Advisory Committee (DSRM), recommended approval of the drug by 18–6, with the proviso that measures be taken to inform women of the drug's side effects.
_	They accompanied them to ringside for the duration of their WWF World Tag Team Championships title match with the Hardy Boyz, assisting the Posse with the proviso that they would receive a title shot if the posse was to win.
_	This was granted by the 7th Division commander, Major General Arthur Allen, on the proviso that there could be no further retreat from there; indeed author Lex McAulay states that Allen told Eather that Imita "was to be held to the death", to which Eather agreed.
_	The National Geographic Channel expressed interest in the program, ordering 26 half-hour episodes, on the proviso that MPH provide the required deficit financing.
_	It was bought out by American Type Founders in 1911 with the proviso that the merger would not take effect for twenty years, so that the employees would have a chance to find new work or retire over time.
_	Film rights were sold for a reported $450,000 with the proviso that a movie not be made until the play finished a two-year run.
_	A single-line spur in Stockton Heath provided for the proposed link to Northwich, and in 1906 the WNLR proposed as a first step to lay tracks as far as Stretton, with the proviso that the Corporation would operate this section.
_	Route planning was given to the engineering firm Margison Babcock and Associates, with the proviso that an American firm expert in expressway building would be involved.
_	Tamati Ngapora, a senior adviser to the King, had invited Te Kooti to Te Kuiti, but on the proviso that he came in peace.
_	Faced with an impending split between its monarchists and Republicans, a compromise was brokered at the 1917 Ard Fheis (party conference) whereby the party would campaign to create a republic, then let the people decide if they wanted a monarchy or republic, subject to the proviso that if they wanted a king, they could not choose someone from Britain's Royal Family.
_	As of April 2014, Saudi authorities in the education ministry have been asked by the Shoura Council to consider lifting a state school ban on sports for girls with the proviso that any sports conform to Sharia rules on dress and gender segregation, according to the official SPA news agency.
_	In 1920, Bowen gave the 400 acres remaining in the Mount Meigs Institute to the state of Alabama with the proviso that they would pay her for the holdings when they officially took over the school.
_	At the outset of World War II, Taylor gave the villa to the Vatican with the proviso that it be used for education in art and music under the direction of the Sinsinawa (WI) Dominican Sisters who administered Rosary College (now Dominican University) in River Forest, Illinois.
_	Similarly a grant made by the whole borough and commonalty in 1349, of a 103 ft plot extending into the middle of the town ditch, carried the proviso that the friars were to maintain the wall (rampart), and also the two great gates to north and south of their court by which the commonalty could have access if necessary.
_	The design process took several years, but a design was finally settled and attached to a royal warrant, with the proviso that Wren was permitted to make any further changes that he deemed necessary.
_	Most of these demands were accepted by the States, but with the proviso that these decisions would be "approved" by the stadtholder.
_	In 1623, Jean de Raval, Lord Tourlaville, and his wife Madeleine de la Vigne offered de la Vigne's cousin enough money to establish a monastery on the proviso that de la Vigne's would become the first abbess or ""superior"".
_	Voeckler announced a complete U-turn on his move a day later, with preliminary reports from France stating that the team "had" indeed found a sponsor – on a three-year deal from the 2011 season onwards – and that it was car rental company Europcar that had joined the team as sponsor on the proviso that Voeckler, the French national champion, was part of the team's roster.
_	This was paid to Chaumpeneys on the proviso that it was put to the "common profit of his house."
_	In particular, some of the signatories—namely, Bahrain, Bangladesh, India, Malaysia, the Philippines, Singapore, the United States, Vietnam, Yemen, and former Yugoslavia—signed with the proviso that no claim of genocide could be brought against them at the International Court of Justice without their consent.
_	What he could do, he reasoned, was to provide incentives for farmers to settle in each township with the proviso that each, in turn, would demonstrate to other farmers what could be done by adopting his improved farming methods.
_	Pious works on behalf of the college also attract reward: all the faithful departed are included as beneficiaries of the masses, but with the proviso that this applies especially"those who shall have given any assistance or regard to the support of the said college."
_	Producer Samuel Goldwyn Jr., in his sole outing as a director, conducted a seven-month search to find the appropriate young lead opposite Fonda, with the proviso that in addition to having "training and dedication", she must be "an actress, not a starlet".
_	George Holmes undertook by written agreement on 16 April 1861 to carry out the contract on offer on the proviso that "the description corresponded with the fact".
_	A few years later the hospital conveyed the property to the National Park System with the proviso that it be known as the Moses H. Cone Memorial Park.
_	After much debate over whether Virginia had truly given its consent to the formation of the new state, the United States Congress adopted a statehood bill on July 14, 1862, which contained the proviso that all blacks in the new state under the age of 21 on July 4, 1863, be freed.
_	The Act of Parliament increased the geographical area of their powers to a radius of fifteen miles outside the establishment for which they were responsible, with the proviso that these powers were only to be exercised in respect of property of the Crown or persons subject to naval or military discipline.
_	An agreement was reached that Miyazaki could start developing his sketches and ideas into a manga for the magazine with the proviso that it would never be made into a film.
_	He then sold the rights to Warner Bros. with the proviso that Blondell and Cagney be cast in the film version.
_	The ESA decided that there should be a total of four development flights flown prior to initiating commercial operations; however, vacant space was made available to operators for these flights on the proviso that success was not guaranteed.
_	The company then donated of land along Doan Brook, Horseshoe Lake (aka Upper Shaker Lake), and Lower Shaker Lake in December 1895 to the city of Cleveland as a park, with the proviso that the city build a road along the park (which effectively connected the Shaker Heights development to Cleveland).
_	Graf accepted with the proviso that his "Roten Jäger" football team went with him.
_	On the proviso that eventually he will be forced to enter hell, either as an ordinary damned soul or as a member of the cadre, he is allotted a number of demonic powers, the nature of which are not initially explained to him.
_	His Latin library—for he had nothing in the vulgar (Italian) tongue—of at least 136 manuscripts was bequeathed between the Augustinians and Franciscans of Treviso, with the proviso that the books should be made available to secular men as well as the brothers.
_	Some time later the NGK acknowledged that the document's contents were true, with the proviso that references in the Belhar Confession to "the poor" not be regarded as an implicit reference to non-whites.
_	Before the start of the 1932 spring training, Mack sold Boley to the Cleveland Indians in a trial basis, with the proviso that the Indians would buy his full contract if satisfied, and return him to the Athletics if not.
_	Financing from the government had been secured again on the proviso that firm orders would be gained from BEA.
_	Before he left on a business trip, in December 1839, she made a will bequeathing to her husband her entire inheritance, with the proviso that he would do the same for her.
_	His mother wanted him to go to university, and then either into the City or the Civil Service, but she agreed to his request with the proviso that he would resume his education later.
_	However, those who are awarded the certificate can not enter a university until they become 18 years old since the certificate is with the proviso that "no qualifications until he or she becomes 18 years old".
_	Paramount changed the way that individual episodes were funded, with overspending on some episode budgets allowed on the proviso that it would be recouped by a reduction in others.
_	Burstall agreed on the proviso that he helped write the script.
_	The other sons were given £40 each, with the proviso that they take up study or trade to earn a living "meet for a gentleman's son."
_	Somewhere in between, after selling the store to Andreas Brown, Steloff donated the building to the American Friends of the Hebrew University Foundation with the proviso that they give Brown the option to later buy it back at $1,000,000.
_	The American component of this expedition was funded by his father, John F. Archbold, with the proviso that his son be included.
_	Pakistan gave up its claim to the tract under a border agreement with China in 1963 with the proviso that the settlement was subject to the final solution of the Kashmir dispute.
_	Fitzroy encouraged Brisbane to continue with Vernet's enterprise with the proviso that whilst private enterprise was encouraged, Argentine assertions of sovereignty would not be welcome.
_	Following her death, their art collection was also donated to Italy, with the proviso that it remain in a museum.
_	In his election campaign he spoke support for the Vogel Scheme with the proviso that the money was spend wisely and for immigration provided it was to the betterment of the colony.
_	Withers noticed the similarity of Larkin's idea to the Bowden Mechanism and introduced him to the Bowden Syndicate, who agreed to manufacture and market the invention with the proviso that it should be patented jointly in the names of the inventor and themselves.
_	According to Goldman, when he first wrote the script and sent it out for consideration, only one studio wanted to buy it—and that was with the proviso that the two lead characters did not flee to South America.
_	Lacan also spoke of "the corrective value of "acting out"", though others qualified this with the proviso that such acting out must be limited in the extent of its destructive/self-destructiveness.
_	He agrees with the proviso that he replace the company head Thomas Betterton in the role of the titular protagonist.
_	McGarel chose to leave his estate to another of his wife's brothers, James Hogg, with the proviso that he include McGarel in his family name.
_	Brokenhearted, she agrees to marry the Sultan on the proviso that he is able to fulfill seven prohibitive conditions:
_	Signalman Harry I'Anson, in the Esholt signal box, gave the Bradford-Harrogate train permission to pass the junction; meanwhile in the Apperley signal box, signalman Thomas Aubrey, knowing the Ilkley-Bradford train was approaching, gave the Leeds-Ilkley train permission to proceed towards the junction under a procedure called clause 16, which allowed trains to near the junction under the proviso that they were likely to encounter a danger signal before the junction proper.
_	Particularly in Sydney, a new class of licensed premises, the wine bar, appeared; there alcohol could be served on the proviso that it was provided in tandem with a meal.
_	When Queen Victoria was proclaimed Queen, it was subject to the proviso that Queen Adelaide was not pregnant at the time.
_	In July 2010, the Israeli cabinet voted to expand the committee's powers to include subpoenas and receiving sworn testimony but with the proviso that they cannot speak with any IDF soldiers.
_	In mathematics, a non-negative integer is called a "Kaprekar number" for a given base if the representation of its square in that base can be split into two parts that add up to the original number, with the proviso that the part formed from the low-order digits of the square must be non-zero—although it is allowed to include "leading" zeroes.
_	Amy survived and McClure was later found guilty of assault with a deadly weapon (reduced from attempted murder) and given one year probation with the proviso that she and her daughter have no further contact with each other.
_	On 22 March, the (NMO) offered to air the film, on the proviso that it could be previewed for any possible illegal material and that Wilders would take part in a debate with proponents and opponents afterwards.
_	When his daughter Margaret was to marry, Sir Hugo gave her and her husband-to-be, Broun of Colstoun, a hand picked pear with the proviso that should anything happen to this fruit it would spell disaster for the Broun family.
_	Although Morrison did not speak Chinese, he was an avid collector of Chinese books and in 1917 Morrison's remarkable library, which contained the largest number of books on China ever collected, was sold to businessman Baron Iwasaki of Tokyo for £35,000 in 1917, with the proviso that serious students should have access to it.
_	Grob said yes on the proviso that his young son Ian Grob could be part of the team, which was agreed.
_	New York City did not want to pay demolition expenses before its lands were flooded and preferred to offer the buildings to the public with the proviso that the buyer remove them at his own expense.
_	The clause was revoked at the Grand Lodge of 1976, with the proviso that it could be reinstated if the law allowed.
_	From then on the abbey was the owner of the entire estate in Erkelenz and the surrounding villages with the proviso that territorial lordship was exercised by the count.
_	The Prime Minister agreed to allow more time on the proviso that the Bill be passed before Christmas 2005.
_	He returned to Nelson in May 1850 and secured full-time employment as a surveyor with the New Zealand Company, but with the proviso that he would be able to take on private work which did not interfere with his duties.
_	When the recording was first talked of, the orchestra were informed that the Beatles had given their permission for the project, but with the proviso that it must be recorded in Liverpool.
_	With the proviso that all cars had to qualify within 85% of the pole-sitting car’s average speed for safety reasons, it meant that several cars failed to qualify.
_	The Woodrow Wilson Fellowships provided full funding for Ph.D. studies, with the proviso that recipients plan a career in college teaching.
_	In the summer of 2007, Campbell was appointed manager of just-relegated Ross County, with the proviso that he would have only one chance at earning the club promotion, and would be sacked if he was unsuccessful.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali nomads would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over them.
_	They did not uphold the appeal, however, because they held (Kirby J dissenting on this point) that the proviso that no substantial miscarriage of justice had occurred applied in this case.
_	However, this coincided with Hvidovre's summer training camp in Portugal, which he was permitted to go on with the proviso that he completed his military service the following month.
_	They were accepted with the proviso that they deposit $425,000 to show good faith, and prove they had sufficient working capital to consort with the other NHL teams.
_	The meeting had been with the proviso that these were working class women representing their class.
_	Members of the 5th SAS returned for 50th anniversary celebrations on 7 November 1994 and during the course of this, gave money to Friends of Loudoun Kirk under the proviso that it be used to erect a plaque on the wall of Loudoun Kirk, bearing the words - "In memory of all members of the Belgian Special Air Service Regiment who under the command of Colonel E. Blondeel, D.S.O. were stationed at Loudoun Castle during 1944 and who wish to express their gratitude for the hospitality and friendship extended to them by the Loudoun Family and the people of Scotland.
_	The World Bank agreed to provide $90 million of development aid to RDC with the proviso that the government did not issue any new concessions granting logging companies rights to exploit the forest.
_	With rehearsals for "Pirata" underway in late December, Bellini was given notice by the La Fenice impresario, Alessandro Lanari, that it was doubtful whether Pacini would be present in time to stage an opera and that a contract was to be prepared with the proviso that it would only become effective on 14 January.
_	Dillon subsequently sold the majority of the company to the University of London in 1956, with the proviso that it used her name.
_	In his work with the International Maize and Wheat Improvement Center, Skovmand set up collaborations with for-profit companies to develop improved strains of agricultural staples, with the proviso that patents not be used in developing nations.
_	Even Christianity, he added (with the proviso that he is speaking as a philosopher) was showing indications of decline.
_	In the year 2002, the Ministry of Environment and Forests sanctioned through its National Lake Conservation Programme (NLCP), Rs247.2 million (about US$5 million) and released Rs173 million (about US $3.46 million) as grant-in-aid with the proviso that the balance amount shall be raised by JDA.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali nomads would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over them.
_	The dispute was finally settled in 1906 when mixed bathing was permitted with the proviso that both men and women should wear suitable swimming costumes.
_	In 1942, the Astors gave Cliveden to the National Trust with the proviso that the family could continue to live in the house for as long as they wished.
_	The English Bill of Rights includes the proviso that arms must be as "allowed by law."
_	The operation was approved with the proviso that it not strain Tenth Air Force's extensive air transport system supplying Allied ground operations in Burma.
_	In April 1918 he returned to London as an official war artist, with the proviso that the work should not be in the Cubist style.
_	The present grant is by reason that the said Cockpit or the greater part thereof is since demolished; but it is to be subject to the proviso that it be not built any nearer than 14 feet of the wall of the said Park at the West end thereof."
_	Columbia Pictures agreed to finance on the proviso that Bartlett rewrite the script for a white co-star.
_	Wateler who, upon his death on 22 July 1927 "bequeathed his estate to the Dutch State, under the proviso that the annual revenue accruing from it should be expended upon the awarding of a prize to those who have made themselves meritorious in the cause of peace."
_	The law adds the proviso that lands purchased after 1 March 1943 would be subject to a 20-year verification period.
_	By 2009, they were allowed to use the version with the Presley lyrics on the reissued edition of the album, with the proviso that the song be titled "Ladies and Gentlemen We Are Floating in Space (I Can't Help Falling in Love)."
_	This was named the Three Rivers Greenway, and the $18 million estimated cost was agreed to by member governments (the cities of Cayce, Columbia, and West Columbia) with the proviso that the Alliance recommend an acceptable funding strategy.
_	Binary models provide a better match for the observed supernovae, with the proviso that no suitable binary helium stars have ever been observed.
_	From this point on, the theory can be treated as if this element actually is distinct, with the proviso that any results found in this way must be resymmetrized, by taking the average of each of the elements of the group being the distinct one.
_	In 1963, Pakistan entered into a treaty with China to transfer part of the Gilgit Agency to China, (the Trans-Karakoram Tract), with the proviso that the settlement was subject to the final solution of the Kashmir dispute.
_	At this time RAAF fighter pilots were trained progressively on the CAC Winjeel, Macchi, Sabre and Mirage, but after considering the feasibility of direct Macchi-to-Mirage conversion, and the impracticability of maintaining the ageing Sabres, the government determined that it was possible to remove the Sabre from the process and retire the type, on the proviso that more Mirage trainers were made available; it subsequently approved the purchase of six new Mirage IIID dual trainers to augment the ten already in service.
_	On January 19, 1928, President Calvin Coolidge signed into law a bill that authorized the appointment of a second judge to the Southern District of Iowa, with the proviso that when the existing judgeship becomes vacant, it shall not be filled unless authorized by Congress.
_	At that time, the Ulster Volunteers were a legal force which had been empowered to carry out drilling and military preparations, with the proviso that it uphold the constitution.
_	The legislation gave council tenants the right to buy their council house at a discounted value, depending on how long they had been living in the house, with the proviso that if they sold their house before a minimum period had expired they would have to pay back a proportion of the discount.
_	Alexander Inglis, having no heirs, bequeathed the Estate to his nephew Alexander Hamilton, with the proviso that he took the Inglis name.
_	After lengthy negotiations, Wigan Athletic purchased the ground from the owner of Woodhouse Lane Stadium for £2,800 with the proviso that greyhound racing never take place at Springfield Park.
_	York had pledged payment in bonds to Alice over four years, on the proviso that his daughter did not die in the mean time.
_	The theory is applicable to all organizationally closed or homeostatic processes that produce enduring and coherent products (where spins have a fixed average phase relationship and also in the sense of Nicholas Rescher's coherence theory of truth with the proviso that the sets and their members exert repulsive forces at their boundaries) through interactions: evolving, learning and adapting.
_	Eventually Raquel and Pablo have another daughter, Mariana suspect Pablo is not the person who appears to be, available to Gaby's daughter from his marriage to Rachel in the care of a babysitter with the proviso that never comes close to Mariana her last four years of happiness INMESA fate wants Pablo dies of heart attack leaving Raquel and Gaby alone and in the deepest sadness.
_	They held the right of first refusal for his next three books, one of which was to be a novel, with the proviso that the contract would be terminated if one of the three were rejected.
_	The new warrant issued in 1682 reads: "Sir George Downing ... [is authorised] to build new and more houses ... subject to the proviso that it be not built any nearer than 14 feet of the wall of the said Park at the West end thereof".
_	The story is about Arun (Gemini Ganeshan), an unemployed teacher who comes across an advertisement offering a job at the Lakshmi School with the proviso that only married couples need apply.
_	Its use in many countries is illegal but is legally used in several countries usually with the proviso that it can only be used for personal use.
_	Eventually a deal was made with the proviso that she would get to choose the show's writers, have script approval, and choose the costumes.
_	On the proviso that he attends anger management counselling, Hanssen gives Malick a final chance and attaches him to the Acute Assessment Unit (AAU).
_	The football club successfully gained permission from Stanley Rous (Football Association) to play on a ground that also held the other sports on the proviso that they did not interfere with the running of the club.
_	This, along with his conduct and attitude towards running the colony's navy prompted the Queensland government to seek his removal in late 1887, although plans to immediately dismiss him were cancelled and it was determined that Wright was kept on until his appointment concluded at the end of 1888, with the proviso that he had not authority to acquire stores for "Gayundah".
_	Stirling-Maxwell had agreed to the development on the proviso that Corrour railway station was built.
_	Executive Order 10450, issued by President Dwight D. Eisenhower in April 1953, expanded the Attorney General's List and added the proviso that members of the United States armed forces could not join or associate with any group on the list under threat of discharge from military service.
_	It was also, of course, subject to the proviso that his jurisdiction to dispense with laws was limited to those laws which were within his jurisdiction or competence.
_	approved the film they did so on the proviso that expletives would be 'bleeped' out.
_	A 'Master Gladwin', i.e. a priest, held it after the Norman Conquest and he assigned it to St Paul's Cathedral, but with the proviso that the advowson be granted at 12 pence a year to the Cluniac Order's, St Saviour's foundation of what was to become Bermondsey Abbey.
_	The agreement also included the proviso that Spain would retain shares in the Bu Craa mining enterprise.
_	She remains with Phil under the proviso that he never cheats on her again.
_	The Jewish community would be entitled to a number of seats in the legislative Assembly proportionate to the number of Jewish citizens (as defined) in Palestine, subject to the proviso that in no case would the number of Jewish representatives exceed one third of the total number of members.<br>
_	Parrott's daughter Linny is accepted by his new wife on the proviso that Linny clean through the lawyer family's archives and categorize what may be of value.
_	A number of items, however, typically fall into one category or the other – with the proviso that their status as fixed or variable can be time specific.
_	The U.S. government gave it back to Old Field in 1935, with the proviso that the government can take it back in case of a national emergency.
_	Frederick George Riley gifted Oakfield House and its grounds to London County Council, on the proviso that it made the site into a public open space with the name 'Agnes Riley Memorial Gardens'.
_	Track asked the band to sign to the company as "The Chris Stamp Band Ltd." a holding company owned by Track, with the proviso that if that holding company went out of business, the rights to any recordings the band made would revert to the band's own business partnership.
_	School sports for girls is forbidden, but as of April 2014, Saudi authorities in the education ministry have been asked by the Shoura Council to consider lifting that ban (with the proviso that any sports conform to Sharia rules on dress and gender segregation, according to the official SPA news agency).
_	The proposal to link the airport with a bridge had been previously approved by Toronto City Council in 1995 and 1998, with the proviso that a business plan would be presented for approval by the THC and later the TPA for operating the airport.
_	The situation changed in 1951 with the Deixonne Law allowing Breton language and culture to be taught 1–3 hours a week in the public school system on the proviso that a teacher was both able and prepared to do so.
_	In March 1986 local commercial classical music station KLEF changed its format and donated its 12,000+ disc library of music to KUHF, with the proviso that the University of Houston commit KUHF to a format that served Houston's classical music audience, recently disfranchised by the loss of KLEF.
_	The new arrangement also gave Chanel the freedom to create new scents, which would be independent of "Parfums Chanel," with the proviso that none would contain the appellation number "5" – she never acted on this opportunity.
_	In May 2012, an authorized capital increase has been applied for, to which alongside the existing shareholders, other people may participate (legal and natural personalities), in all an additional a share capital in the amount of CHF 656,000, with the proviso that former shareholders may exercise pre-emptive rights of one share for two existing one.
_	Of the established stars, Leon Russell had committed also, but on the proviso that he be supported by members of his tour band.
_	In December 1949, the park was leased to the City of Oakland with the proviso that Knowland Park would always remain a public park.
_	In this regard, UNAMIR was established for a period of six months subject to the proviso that it will be extended beyond the initial ninety days upon a review by the Council as to whether progress had been made towards the implementation of the Arusha Accords.
_	Dimension told him to write the script for "Judgment" with the proviso that if they disliked it, he would direct "Enter Darkness" without being paid.
_	Twenty-nine subspecies are listed by Chapman and Flux in their book on lagomorphs, including in addition "L. e. alba", "L. e. argenteogrisea", "L. e. biarmicus", "L. e. borealis", "L. e. caspicus", "L. e. caucasicus", "L. e. flavus", "L. e. gallaecius", "L. e. hispanicus", "L. e. hyemalis", "L. e. granatensis", "L. e. iturissius", "L. e. kalmykorum", "L. e. meridiei", "L. e. meridionalis", "L. e. niethammeri", "L. e. niger", "L. e. tesquorum", and "L. e. tumak", but excluding "L. e. connori", "L. e. creticus", "L. e. cyprius", "L. e. judeae", "L. e. rhodius", and "L. e. syriacus", with the proviso that the subspecies they list are of "very variable status".
_	Consequently, the London County Council were given notice that the Arch and the Great Hall would be demolished, which was granted on the proviso that the Arch would be restored and re-sited.
_	Most of the powers, including those of foreign affairs and defence, were concurrent powers, with the proviso that if there was a conflict between the federal and a state law, then the federal law "will prevail".
_	She summons Robin Hood to tell him of the match and Robin agrees to it, with the proviso that if he misses the mark, whether it be light or dark, he will be hanged.
_	The requirement was a minimum of two years service, of which at least one year was continuous, rendered voluntarily and without pay within or outside the borders of the Union of South Africa, in one or more of the officially recognised voluntary non-military organisations, such as the Red Cross and the Governor-General's War Fund, with the proviso that five or more hours were worked every week.
_	She was immediately offered for sale, with the terms of sale including her copper sheathing and the proviso that the buyer post a bond of £2000 that he would break her up within a year.
_	Therefore, one can say that the "quantum of charge" is "e", with the proviso that quarks are not to be included.
_	The pools companies, many daily newspapers and the sporting press also issued "plans", which were subsets of full perms: these enabled the punter to cover more matches for the same stake, with the proviso that even if eight draws were in the selections, they might not all be in a single line of the plan (but well designed plans could give a guarantee, such as 'if the plan hits eight draws it must win at least a 3rd dividend').
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali nomads would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over them.
_	Alexander VI confirmed Christopher as coadjutor under the proviso that he should only ascend to office having come of age (27 years), which was in 1514.
_	In "Video Movie Guide 2002", mention of the stop-action animation was made but with the proviso that "the film monster wasn't bad but Willis O'Brien was clearly working with a low budget".
_	The product topology for infinite products has a twist, and this has to do with being able to make all the projection maps continuous and to make all functions into the product continuous if and only if all its component functions are continuous (i.e. to satisfy the categorical definition of product: the morphisms here are continuous functions): we take as a basis of open sets to be the collection of all Cartesian products of open subsets from each factor, as before, with the proviso that all but finitely many of the open subsets are the entire factor:
_	In addition, Freer's bequest to the Smithsonian came with the proviso that he would execute full curatorial control over the collection until his death.
_	In 1987, Herbert Thompson donated the property to a local non-profit, with the proviso that it continue to be operated in the traditional manner as a museum property.
_	Many contracts contain the proviso that in case of future dispute, the parties would abide by "the decision of the king."
_	In 1864, in anticipation of the new railway line generating high demand for a river crossing, an Act of Parliament was passed granting permission to the Wandsworth Bridge Company to build a bridge, to be financed by tolls, with the proviso that the bridge would be at least wide and cross the river with no more than three spans.
_	The RUS outlined the possibility of adding in the short term an additional fast service, making 4 such trains per hour (tph) in each direction between Manchester and Liverpool, with the proviso that all the services would need to use the same Manchester station.
_	I and the Emperor Henry V, Henry I's son-in-law, persuaded the pope to overlook the irregularities of the election, with the proviso that William swore to obey "all things that the Pope imposed upon him."
_	Specifically with respect to federal antitrust laws it exempts the "business of insurance" as long as the state regulates in that area, with the proviso that cases of boycott, coercion, and intimidation remain prohibited regardless of state regulation.
_	In 1942 Laurence Housman also deposited an essay entitled "A. E. Housman's 'De Amicitia'" (there is a link to the text, below in this article, under "Further reading") in the British Library, with the proviso that it was not to be published for 25 years.
_	Therefore, with the proviso that theophylline and theobromine cross the blood-brain barrier very poorly (thus, have low CNS effects on the heart), the pharmacological effects of adenosine may be blunted in individuals taking large quantities of methylxanthines.
_	On 31 October 1922 it was authorized to broadcast regular programs, with the proviso that advertising was not allowed.
_	He began his piano studies at 14, and by 17 was accepted into the Junior department at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama, where he won the annual piano prize, on the proviso that he focus on repertoire written specifically for the left hand.
_	On 2 April orders were issued for the operation to go ahead, with the proviso that Rangoon be in Allied hands by 5 May at the latest.
_	Her father provided her a comfortable living, under the proviso that she would not sell her paintings.
_	The Parlement of Paris, which had expelled its Huguenot members, resisted registering the Edict—as did the provincial parlements— but capitulated after remonstrances, adding the proviso that the Edict was to have limited application until the King should achieve his majority, when a national council would decide the religious question.
_	Fosun bought Wolves from Steve Morgan, who had taken ownership in August 2007 for a nominal sum of £10 with the proviso that £30 million was injected into the club, ending an almost four-year search for a new buyer.
_	The happily married Shaky only agreed on the proviso that he could bring the rest of the band with him.
_	In 1857 as one of the properties legally denoted as the Main Line of Public Works, with rapidly improving railroad technology driving rapid changes in capabilities, the Railroad was sold along with most of the Pennsylvania Canal system, to the young Pennsylvania Railroad (PRR) which acquired properties of the Pennsylvania Canal Commission as far west as Pittsburgh and included the Allegheny Portage Railroad with the proviso that the Railroad had to link Philadelphia to Pittsburgh.
_	After being subject to a review by the BBC Trust and a recommendation from the Audience Council Scotland in 2009, a plan was announced to broadcast the channel on Freeview, in Scotland only, from the digital switchover (2010) under the proviso that reach of the service extended beyond the core Gaelic audience to 250,000.
_	In 1670, at the age of eight, he was betrothed to Mary Wood, only child and sole heiress of Sir Henry Wood, 1st Baronet, Clerk of the Green Cloth, but with the proviso that the marriage be delayed until Mary was aged sixteen.
_	Williams agreed to become president of the newly formed Committee for the Promotion of New Music, with the proviso that it "avoid all cliques [and] give a welcome to all good work in whatever style or school".
_	The Cabinet agreed for publication to continue, subject to vetting by the War Office and the Cabinet, with the proviso that the decision might be reversed if the Corbett volume was badly received; the volume was published in 1920, to extremely good press reviews.
_	The issues relating to the chapel were not resolved until 1372 when a charter dated 4 and 5 October stating that the Abbot and the vicar of Townstal assented to its consecration at the expense of the parishioners who were also to bear the cost of services, with the proviso that if it was neglected in favour of the mother church at Townstal, then it would be closed.
_	Adams and John Hancock had reconciled, and they finally agreed to give their support for the Constitution, with the proviso that some amendments be added later.
_	The album "Shapeshifter" (1992) is the fourth installment in the saga, in which Zero meets an urban shaman who agrees to take him to the next level of awareness on the proviso that Zero spends nine months on an aeroplane traveling where he wants, but not using money or eating anything other than airline food.
_	The control of the rivers Sutlej and Beas and part of the Indus passed to the British, with the proviso that this was not to interfere with the passage of passenger boats owned by the Lahore Government.
_	When the equipment is to be used overseas, the KT66 may be difficult to obtain, and the 6L6 glass and metal types may be regarded as direct replacements, with the proviso that the total anode and screen dissipation should be reduced from 25 W to 21.5 W by reducing the total current from 125 mA to 110 mA by adjustment of R."
_	An agreement was reached that Miyazaki could start developing his sketches and ideas into a manga for the magazine with the proviso that it would never be made into a film.
_	After lengthy negotiations, Wigan Athletic purchased the ground from the owners of the Woodhouse Lane Stadium for £2,800 with the proviso that greyhound racing never take place at Springfield Park.
_	The facility passed from state ownership in 2001 with the proviso that it would remain operational for at least 15 years.
_	None of the submitted plans came within this cost constraint, but plans from Alfred G Jones were accepted with the proviso that they were revised.
_	The agency received permission to use the building in the background of the shot under the proviso that it not be identifiable, so the address on the awning was changed to the non-existent "63003 77th Street".
_	The Society also runs a Transport Museum, located in the Heritage Centre in Limbe on land granted by the Malawi Railways with the proviso that the history of transport in Malawi be preserved with emphasis on the Railways role in opening up Nyasaland, a land-locked country, to the sea.
_	Monasteries were dissolved at Berich, Flechtdorf, Netze, Ober-Werbe, Schaaken and Volkhardinghausen, but with the proviso that they would remain open until the death of the last spiritual resident.
_	In 1818, Raffles managed to convince Lord Hastings, the then governor-general of India and his superior in the British East India Company, to fund an expedition to establish a new British base in the region, but with the proviso that it should not antagonise the Dutch.
_	The application was approved, with the proviso that the wheel not operate during remembrance events such as Armistice Day and Remembrance Sunday.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali residents would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	Case 3 BWS studies may use any of the types of design typically used for a DCE, with the proviso that the number of profiles (alternatives) in a choice set must be three or more for the BWS task to make sense.
_	A fief (also fee, feu, feud, tenure or fiefdom, , , "feodum" or "beneficium") was understood to be a thing (land, property), which its owner, the liege lord ("Lehnsherr"), had transferred to the hereditary ownership of the beneficiary on the basis of mutual loyalty, with the proviso that it would return to the lord under certain circumstances.
_	He also awarded a four-year annual grant to the committee of the Aspatria Parliament, valued at £100 on the proviso that the committee seek annual re-election and present an official account of their stewardship.
_	On the June 24 episode of "SmackDown", Christian demanded another attempt at the title from SmackDown General Manager Theodore Long; his demand was granted with the proviso that he could defeat Kane.
_	By 26 February Edward's name had been added to a list of those "fit to be forborne from being indicted, but yet to be fined", with the proviso that he was "to be delivered upon good bonds."
_	In June 2013, the population was estimated as 2097 with the proviso that the number may be an underestimate.
_	The case was eventually resolved out of court in September 1979, with the proviso that Longet never tell or write about her story.
_	The film ends with the proviso that the family lives in hiding protected by the Royal Canadian Mounted Police.
_	Locke argued that natural resources could be appropriated as long as doing so satisfies the proviso that there remains "enough, and as good, left in common for others".
_	Grob said yes on the proviso that his young son Ian Grob could be part of the team, which was agreed.
_	Lincoln granted permission in 1861, with the proviso that Brady finance the project himself.
_	In the Cronquist system, it was placed in Cornaceae, but the APG II system give it its own family, Aralidiaceae, with the proviso that "[s]ome of the families are monogeneric and could possibly be merged when well-supported sister-group relationships have been established."
_	She agreed, on the proviso that Stringband would become a part-time enterprise that would allow her time to pursue her solo career, as well as her playwriting and other interests.
_	In 1939 Mary Lord Harrison sold the house to the Arthur Jordan School of Music (now located at Butler University as the Jordan College of Fine Arts), with the proviso that the house would always serve as a memorial to Benjamin Harrison.
_	Arbitrarily complex braid patterns can be done in cable knitting, with the proviso that the wales must move ever upwards; it is generally impossible for a wale to move up and then down the fabric.
_	Though honoured, Weldon only accepted on the proviso that it would be truly international, with the headquarters moved around the world.
_	This second group may include congregations whose church allows them to choose, with the proviso that the choice remains in effect at least until the end of the church year.
_	However, when her manservant Toby (Vince Townsend Jr.) points out that Joyce has missed the last train back to town, Lavinia reluctantly invites her to stay the night under the proviso that she not leave her room.
_	Noel approached the group about joining with the proviso that he would become the band's sole songwriter and leader, and that they would commit to an earnest pursuit of commercial success.
_	Catherine hands the diary to Rae with the proviso that he not reveal it to Matthew.
_	The National League allowed the Colts to sign Umbricht to a scout contract given the circumstances, with the proviso that it would become a player contract if he rejoined the active roster.
_	Ordinary prose tended to follow the pattern of subject, direct object, indirect object, adverbial words or phrases, verb (with the proviso that when noun and verb make a compound, as "impetum facio" 'I attack / make an attack' the noun is generally placed close to the verb).
_	Every case was made the subject of careful, accurate and complete study, and every student was trained to think on surgical lines, always with the proviso that the recovery of the patient was the important thing.
_	On January 19, 1928, President Calvin Coolidge signed into law a bill that authorized a second judgeship for the District, with the proviso that when the existing judgeship (held by Judge Wade) becomes vacant, it shall not be filled unless authorized by Congress.
_	In a safehouse, Hush was patched up and given a sample of Clayface mud that would heal his surgery scars on the proviso that he wouldn't reveal his new face again until the plan was ready.
_	£20 was donated by J C Fidler, on the proviso that "no liquors were to be sold" on site.
_	It ratified the Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Discrimination against Women, with the proviso that the convention could not override Islamic law.
_	He bequeathed his belongings to the municipality on the proviso that a good field be acquired, and that the rent drawn therefrom be used to bake "Stutzwecken" during Holy Week and to buy wine.
_	Harold's Cross Stadium was at last granted permission to run the Irish Greyhound Derby with the proviso that they contributed a minimum of £100 towards the event.
_	At the start of June, oil targets were made a priority of night bombing with attacks on other war industry to be made on dark nights (when the oil targets could not be located) but with the proviso that "indiscriminate action" should be avoided.
_	He offered Lambert the chance to talk to Norwich on the proviso that no position could be accepted until compensation was discussed and agreed between the two clubs.
_	Ward supported the change, but only with the proviso that it not be adopted until the conclusion of his term of office.
_	When "Lusitania" was built, her construction and operating expenses were subsidised by the British government, with the proviso that she could be converted to an armed merchant cruiser (AMC) if need be.
_	Booth donated the museum to the city in 1890 with the proviso that the display of over 300 dioramas should not be altered, and it was opened under Brighton civic ownership in 1891.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali residents would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	Film rights were sold for a reported $450,000 with the proviso that a movie not be made until the play finished a two-year run.
_	In September 1935, a follow-up order of 180 aircraft was also received from the Air Ministry; this order had the proviso that all aircraft had to be delivered prior to the end of 1937.
_	Hennessy left his entire estate to Harry Robertson Craig with the proviso that on Craig's death the Royal Hibernian Academy should be the beneficiary.
_	In 1904 he made a second gift of £50,000 to be devoted to the same department, with the proviso that the government should provide £25,000 for buildings.
_	Castelli bowed to Saavedra's proposal to form a Junta, but with the proviso that the procurator of the Cabildo, Julián de Leiva, had a decisive vote in the appointment.
_	He supplied the publishers with a key to every incident in the book—but with the proviso that this should never be published.
_	In 1696, the Berkeley family sold the house and grounds to the 1st Duke of Devonshire (who renamed it Devonshire House) on the proviso that the view from the rear of the house should not be spoiled.
_	Čeferin had a series of good governance reform proposals approved in April 2017, including the introduction of term limits for UEFA presidents and UEFA Executive Committee members and the proviso that Executive Committee candidates must hold an active office (president, vice-president, general secretary or CEO) with their national association.
_	The Book of Jacob condemned polygamy as adultery, but left open the proviso that "For if I will, saith the Lord of Hosts, raise up seed unto me, I will command my people; otherwise, they shall hearken unto these things."
_	Upon arrival he learns that the money comes with the proviso that he must work his way up in the company for 6 months without getting into trouble; unbeknownst to him, his stepbrother has hired the 3 worst managers in the company to try to bring him down.
_	The King finally agrees to fund Champollion's expedition to Egypt on the proviso that he does not publish any finds that contradict the teachings of the Church.
_	The leaders agreed to conditionally accept Cameroon as a member due to improvements in its human rights situation with the proviso that it fully comply with the Harare Declaration on pluralism and human rights by 1995.
_	An unspent $175,000, along with $400,000 Ladenburg had requested for 2008, were instead set aside with the proviso that they could be used for "evidence-based programs that are directed towards breaking the cycle of drug addiction".
_	Despite Davout's reports to the contrary, Napoleon ordered him to attack the Austrians on his front in the morning, with the proviso that Lefebvre's equally depleted corps would support him if he needed help (A total of approximately 36,000 men for both corps).
_	This argument was resolved in a matter of days and the stamps were allowed to be sold from March with the proviso that these stamps would only be valid for use till 31 May 1919.
_	He had arranged for some of his letters and books to be destroyed, while others were to be sent to the Bodleian Library, with the proviso that some of them would not be opened until the year 2000.
_	He did this in the proviso that she cannot talk to anyone except those who were investigating her and she must return to the house 24 hours after she left.
_	Buckinghamshire County Council then acquired the property with the proviso that it be used for educational purposes.
_	Despite secretly being a revolutionary Chan Do Yeung (Damian Lau) is chosen to be principal of the academy and agrees, on the proviso that he be allowed to admit Han students.
_	In a 2006 opinion poll published by the independent Russian Public Opinion Research Center (VCIOM), 34% of the respondents approved the slogan on the proviso that by "Russians" is meant all citizens of the Russian Federation, 23% said they would not object to the idea if implemented within "reasonable limits", 20% (mostly in Moscow and St. Petersburg) believed the realization of this concept – without any restrictions – was long overdue.
_	Ostensibly the stickers were to match the colour of the disc and the shaft, but it was possible to mix and match shafts, discs, and stickers (with the proviso that the stickers only stuck once).
_	If they are to be interpreted as phenomena, this should be done with the proviso that they are phenomena with no corresponding noumena, no hidden underlying ground.
_	He offered Lambert the chance to talk to Norwich on the proviso that no position could be accepted until compensation was discussed and agreed between the two clubs.
_	The government via the Olympic Delivery Authority (ODA) hence agreed to underwrite a greater part of the required sum, and a scale-back of the project scale by 25%, on the proviso that athletes competing in non-London based events would be housed locally to their competition.
_	At her death in 1945, Scheyer left her collection to UCLA with the proviso that the university meet conditions of a 1944 gift of her friend Walter Arensberg's modern art collection.
_	She accepted a position with "The New York Times" in 1952 with the proviso that she be assigned to the city room and not the women's department of the paper.
_	It was acquired from its founder, Hubert Howe Bancroft, in 1905, with the proviso that it retain the name Bancroft Library in perpetuity.
_	PTUs only work on the proviso that the system has not punctured and lost its fluid, because they do not permit fluid transfer, only the transfer of mechanical work.
_	The author agreed on the proviso that he could direct the film.
_	These transactions were paid for before the merchant sold on on the proviso that it was put to the "common profit of his house."
_	In Austin, the governor re-issues the order to Call and McCrae to go and rescue Scull, on the proviso that they can convince cattle ranchers to provide them the 1000-head ransom on credit.
_	It was founded in 1868, the result of a $20,000 donation by Paran Stevens to Claremont with the proviso that the city appropriate a like sum.
_	In correspondence with General Thomas Gage, General Frederick Haldimand sent him some of George Gauld’s maps along with his report, with the proviso that no one else should copy the maps drawn by Gauld.
_	The Liverpool Cathedral Act 1902 authorised the purchase of the site and the building of a cathedral, with the proviso that as soon as any part of it opened for public worship, St Peter's Church should be demolished and its site sold to provide the endowment of the new cathedral's chapter.
_	She made Mohammad Mosaddegh and his descendants the custodians of the hospital with the proviso that the custody would go to her other son Abolhassan Diba if there were no other descendants.
_	Saxon offered a residency lasting from two to six months, with the proviso that those artists that wished to apply for the gig, must have previously recorded some music.
_	A document dated from 1248 records that Margaret II, Countess of Flanders, ceded additional territory to the parish of Sint-Niklaas with the proviso that it would remain bare, which explains the unusual size of the central market square today.
_	In 1836, Peter Gerard Stuyvesant (1778–1847) – the great-great-grandson of Peter Stuyvesant – and his wife Helen (or Helena) Rutherfurd reserved four acres of the Stuyvesant farm and sold it for a token five dollars to the City of New York as a public park, originally to be called Holland Square, with the proviso that the City of New York build a fence around it.
_	The ground is not owned by the club, but is a Clarence City Council facility who lease the ground to the club on a long-term basis on the proviso that other sports be permitted to share the facilities with Clarence United.
_	Hahnemann replied on 15 June 1833 and stated that he was "delighted that such a happy idea has occurred to you" and based on the proviso that each remedy must be "homeopathically suitable, but each from a different side", Hahnemann further stated that "the procedure is so consonant with the requirements of our art that nothing can be urged against it".
_	He therefore persuaded the king to create him Baron Bruce of Tottenham, with special remainder to his younger nephew Hon. Thomas Brudenell (1739–1814), 4th son of George Brudenell, 3rd Earl of Cardigan (1685–1732) of Deene Park in Northamptonshire, by his wife Elizabeth Bruce, to whom he also bequeathed his estates with the proviso that he should adopt the additional surname of Bruce.
_	While the Government of India accepted the accession, it added the proviso that it would be submitted to a "reference to the people" after the state is cleared of the invaders, since "only the people, not the Maharaja, could decide where Kashmiris wanted to live."
_	If, however, any convention for the regulation of the Arms Traffic, to which the British Government may be a party, shall come into force, the right of importation of arms and ammunition by the Nepal Government shall be subject to the proviso that the Nepal Government shall first become a party to that Convention, and that such importation shall only be made in accordance with the provisions of that Convention.
_	The first General Synod session was held in Toronto in 1893, with the proviso that the parameters of its authority would not undermine the local independence of dioceses.
_	The harbour and its immediate area were given to the Genoese by the Emperor Henry IV with the proviso that the Genoese protect the coastline from piracy.
_	In 1546, Duke Wolfgang approved the expansion of Heinrich Kolb’s mill by two grist runs on the proviso that the estate mill at Ulmet not have any business taken away from it.
_	All the real estate bequests in her Will contain the proviso that the legatee should not "cut down trees, cultivate land or build houses" in any portion of lands she owned in England or in Sicily.
_	Caradog pays for his son Glyn's air ticket on the proviso that Glyn (Morris) comes on a 'pilgrimage' to find his 'little butterfly' who he spent a short romantic period with during the war.
_	These were fitted with six types of electric motor with coachwork by five different builders, and were supplied on the proviso that should the trial be a success, Belfast Corporation would purchase them and should it fail, they would be returned.
_	He decides that he will allow the US to build its base in his country — on the proviso that they allow him to claim Sunny as another wife.
_	The panel members could interview the remaining characters, with the proviso that only the murderer could lie.
_	He was freed when a friend paid the tax and accumulated fines ($5.62) "with the proviso that the town shall not sue him for board at the jail."
_	Whilst Maxwell agreed to support a rights issue he soon backed out and instead loaned £1.1 million to Scholar to loan to Spurs, with the proviso that the deal be kept secret.
_	Brown accepted the position of pastor, with the proviso that the church, which had been in use for nearly eighty years, be discontinued.
_	Under the APG II system, each of these genera was placed in its own family, but with the proviso that "Some of the families are monogeneric and could possibly be merged when well-supported sister-group relationships have been established."
_	The selling agent set a guide price of £1 million, with the proviso that the estate would need millions spent to restore it.
_	However, they did this with the proviso that socialists should not align themselves with any pro-capitalist factions to that end.
_	The Code calls for the gown trim to be either black or the color designated for the field of study in which the doctorate is earned, with the proviso that the degree of Doctor of Philosophy (Ph.D.) uses the dark blue velvet of philosophy regardless of the particular field studied.
_	Gasparotto went on to accuse two individuals, one from Gorizia and the other from Chiana, of being witches, and was subsequently released by Montefalco on the proviso that he return for further questioning at a later date.
_	They demanded complete independence with the proviso that Britain be allowed to supervise the Suez Canal and the public debt.
_	£20 was donated by J C Fidler, on the proviso that "no liquors were to be sold" on site.
_	Instead, the government green-lit development in the area on the proviso that a corridor be preserved for mass transit to be built in future.
_	In February 2003, the local Leigh-on-Sea town council voted to support the airport's expansion plans "on the proviso that disruption to St. Laurence church was minimised by moving, not demolishing it."
_	In his will, Gardner left the museum to his assistant there, with the proviso that if he did not want it then it would go to his initiate Monique Wilson, which is what happened.
_	Frustrated, the band finally decided to sign to Sony Records, on the proviso that they be allowed to release their music through their own Furtive label - thus regaining a higher degree of creative control while still enjoying the benefit of the major label's distribution and advertising clout.
_	In October 2001, whilst the subdivision consent was tied up in the Environment Court, they entered into a conditional sale with the Ansleys for $1.05 million, on the proviso that PNU obtained the necessary consents by 28 February 2002.
_	Although Brunel was initially said to be in two minds about directing a "war film" as he did not care for the genre on moral or aesthetic grounds, he agreed to go ahead with the proviso that there would be no material directly depicting the conflict, nor any appeal to jingoistic sentiment.
_	On 15 December 2009 George was given an indeterminate sentence, and told that she would serve at least seven years, with the proviso that she must prove she is safe to society before being released.
_	The set was purchased by the Ephraim family who donated the setting to the British Admiralty on the proviso that one piece each should go to the ships that most distinguished themselves in World War I.
_	Entrants were permitted to use two fields at Ronaldsway on the proviso that the entry was limited to 10 aircraft.
_	In December 1938, the court returned control of the beach to the municipal council under the proviso that a bond repayment agreement was created; Asbury Park was the only beach in New Jersey affected by the Beach Commission law.
_	Rommel wished to attack, having refitted the force in Libya, to forestall an Eighth Army offensive, which was agreed by Hitler and Mussolini, with the proviso that an advance would stop at Tobruk, ready for the invasion of Malta in August.
_	Then the Mutual Broadcasting System picked up the series which it ran until 1947 [Rathbone left in 1946 and was replaced by Tom Conway, Nigel Bruce remained] with the proviso that Meiser continue to contribute “new adventures”.
_	Hugh Ruttledge was chosen as leader, with the proviso that, at forty-eight years of age, he was not to undertake any climbing on the upper reaches of the mountain.
_	She agrees to let him take a final voyage, with the proviso that he does not go with his brothers nor returns to Santo Domingo or the other colonies.
_	In the latter part of 1974 they secured another recording deal with Playboy Records on the proviso that they retain the name Hamilton, Joe Frank, and Reynolds, even though Reynolds had left the group.
_	This new power is subject to important qualifications in s.28(2) including the proviso that the Crown can resist disclosure where this could be “injurious to the public interest”.
_	But Root Doctor asked him to join and he did so on the proviso that they record an album of original material.
_	They visit the International Money Council (already mentioned in the Carl Barks' comic The Fabulous Philosopher's Stone) in Paris looking for additional clues, and Director Molay reveals to them that the Knights Templars, a crusader order which evolved into Europe's first bank network, ceded to the Kings of Spain and Portugal the crown to be sent to Cathay, in exchange of a share of the future trade, with the proviso that, should the voyage fail to reach its destination, the contract would become null and void by October 13, 1582, and the crown would be returned to the Order; it's also mentioned that the Templars, whose properties were seized by Philip IV of France, managed to spirit away their treasury in several locations, including Scotland.
_	Grob said yes on the proviso that his young son Ian Grob could be part of the team, which was agreed.
_	While the Government of India accepted the accession, it added the proviso that it would be submitted to a "reference to the people" after the state is cleared of the invaders, since "only the people, not the Maharaja, could decide where Kashmiris wanted to live."
_	To solve this problem we simply add the proviso that an existentially quantified statement is true under an interpretation for at least one substitution instance in which the constant designates something that exists.
_	Studio president Louis B. Mayer agreed to the idea, on the proviso that the duo appear in a film for MGM in the near future.
_	While the Government of India accepted the accession, it added the proviso that it would be submitted to a "reference to the people" after the state is cleared of the invaders, since "only the people, not the Maharaja, could decide where Kashmiris wanted to live."
_	It was not exclusively local and would feature music from anywhere, the prime criteria being the editors' taste, and the proviso that it had not (yet) been released on vinyl.
_	His financing of a rescue came with the proviso that Seversky, as President, would have his personal budget cut, while the board of directors transferred more power to managing director Wallace Kellett.
_	The God-given authority of the pope over all bishops and the whole Church was reaffirmed, but with the proviso that "the powers that he has should be used not to destroy but to uplift".
_	She accepted the post with the proviso that her husband taught the boys at the school.
_	An English grace was composed by Henley in 1995, with the proviso that the Latin grace be retained at least once per week.
_	Canada demanded and received permission from London to send its own delegation to the Versailles Peace Talks in 1919, with the proviso that it sign the treaty under the British Empire.
_	In what he later described as his most challenging "takeover", probably because it was his first, he found a way to invest $500,000 in the ailing business, on the proviso that the state Minister for Industry, Sir Charles Court, would persuade the Government of Western Australia to forgive the $500,000 in loans they had made.
_	The notion of Taylorism was supportive of improvement in pay and conditions in workplaces under the proviso that workers were paid in accordance to their output.
_	These conditions – including the proviso that Mrs Spears would exercise complete control over the female personnel – were accepted in writing by General Charles de Gaulle, who was by now leading the Free French Forces from his headquarters in London.
_	Paynter allowed "his player" to stay at the club on the proviso that Tucker would sign professional forms with West Ham as soon as the season was over.
_	While Thorn waits outside, Sir Humphrey comes back in with news that the Treasury can encompass the PM’s tax cut, with the proviso that the anti-smoking policy is shelved.
_	Ded Byrds were spotted supporting The Pretenders by Sire Records boss, Seymour Stein who signed them on the spot to a five-year record contract on the proviso that the band changed its name.
_	Raymonde’s cartoons were accepted, though as far as men’s magazines were concerned, on the proviso that he work exclusively for "Playboy".
_	Historian Dick Scott has claimed Fox, who had already expressed in writing his wish that the Waimate Plains be sold and settled, was appointed chairman of the commission on the proviso that he support the government's land policies in the area and secure central Taranaki for white settlement.
_	After further discussions between Churchill and Abdullah in Jerusalem, it was mutually agreed that Transjordan was accepted into the mandatory area as an Arab country apart from Palestine with the proviso that it would be, initially for six months, under the nominal rule of the emir Abdullah and that it would not form part of the Jewish national home to be established west of the River Jordan.
_	Due to his youth Pope Pius II confirmed Henry's election under the proviso that he would be only administrator until reaching the age of 27, which was in 1467.
_	As well as countermanding from the bench some of Amin's more draconian orders, Kiwanuka had also secretly agreed to support Obote's return to power, with the proviso that Kiwanuka would be involved in constitutional reform.
_	He persuaded the king to create him Baron Bruce of Tottenham, with special remainder to his younger nephew Hon. Thomas Brudenell (1739–1814), 4th son of George Brudenell, 3rd Earl of Cardigan (1685–1732) by his wife Elizabeth Bruce, to whom he also bequeathed his estates with the proviso that he should adopt the additional surname of Bruce, thus having created a new noble family bearing doubly the Bruce name, to continue the custodianship of the Seymour lands.
_	The U.S. in 1950 started to fund the French effort on the proviso that the Vietnamese be given more autonomy.
_	Bilandic was selected with the proviso that he would not contend in the election.
_	Until 1996, the stone was kept with the chair in Westminster Abbey, but it was moved that year to Edinburgh Castle in Scotland, where it is displayed on the proviso that it be returned to England for use at future coronations.
_	They had re-engineered the 003 design as the ATAR 101 (model R.101) by October, and granted a production contract on the proviso that actual production would be carried out in France.
_	Dustin is able to secure permanent US residency for Sunshine and her mother on the proviso that she joins his club.
_	In March 1920 Molly MacCarthy began the Memoir Club to help Desmond and herself write their memoirs; and also "for their friends to regroup after the war (with the proviso that they should always tell the truth)".
_	But it was Roman custom to permit or even encourage the subject peoples of the provinces and foreign communities in Rome to maintain their ancestral religion, unless specific practices were regarded as disruptive or subversive: "A "religio" was "licita" for a particular group on the basis of tribe or nationality and traditional practices, coupled with the proviso that its rites were not offensive to the Roman people or its gods."
_	De Sivry confided Rimbaud's texts to Louis Cardonel with the proviso that Verlaine was not to be involved in their publication.
_	Although they had not completed their training, the 22nd Brigade was eventually allocated to this task in early 1941, under the proviso that they would be relieved after a short period and returned to Australia to complete their training prior to being sent to the Middle East.
_	As early as 1906 there were discussions about the possibility of a German invasion of France, yet always the proviso that it was in doubt, "that matters might be brought to a point in which a pacific issue would be difficult."
_	However, they made the offer on the proviso that the Mascotte tunnel was part of the deal.
_	Other 140 women received ₩31.5 million ($26,000) as support money from the Korean government with the proviso that women sign a pledge not to receive AWF money.
_	In September 1916, Cantiere Navale Triestino (CNT) received authorization to build two boats of the class, "U-48" and "U-49", with the proviso that the boats be built in Budapest with final assembly at the Pola Navy Yard.
_	For a time British authorities threatened Masterman with legal action, but in the end bowed to the inevitable and allowed publication, with the proviso that sixty passages in the manuscript be deleted.
_	His second wife, Anne, was given plate and other household goods, as well as a large flock of sheep, with the proviso that if Anne were to remarry the plate and goods would go to Richard Lee "alias" Hassall and Russell Lee "alias" Hassall, the two illegitimate sons born before their marriage.
_	Justinian delivered to the Pope a written confession of faith, which the latter accepted with the proviso that "although he could not admit in a layman the right of teaching religion, yet he observed with pleasure that the zeal of the Emperor was in perfect accord with the decisions of the Fathers".
_	It was Tholozan, then official physician to the Qajar court, who intervened on Dieulafoy's behalf with the Persian authorities to obtain permission to explore Susa further, with the proviso that the Tomb of Daniel not be disturbed.
_	Neither Te Whiti nor Tawhiao attended, so Sheehan visited Parihaka and then the Waimate Plains, where he appeared to have persuaded Titokowaru to permit land to be surveyed on the proviso that burial places, cultivations and fishing grounds would be respected and that fenced reserves would be created.
_	First, the cash-strapped Crown government in Canada could pay and reward the services and loyalty of the "United Empire Loyalists" who, originated outside of Canada, without encumbrance of debt by being awarded with small portions of land (under ) with the proviso that it be settled by those to which it was granted; Second, portions would be reserved for the future use of the Crown and the Clergy that did not require settlement by which to gain control.
_	It again voted 1,787 men, although with the proviso that they would not serve outside the continent, and actually raised 1,547 men.
_	The triangular parcel on which the buildings stand was given to the town in 1833 by the Hebert family, with the proviso that the town hall be built there, and the county courthouse, should Ellsworth be chosen as Hancock County's county seat.
_	Philippe reluctantly agrees with the proviso that they conceive in a desert.
_	The convention includes the proviso that in case of extraordinary drought or serious accident to the irrigation system in the United States, the amount of water delivered to the Mexican canal shall be diminished in the same proportion as the water delivered to lands under the irrigation system in the United States downstream of Elephant Butte Dike.
_	What he could do, he reasoned, was to provide incentives for farmers to settle in each township with the proviso that each, in turn, would demonstrate to other farmers what could be done by adopting his improved farming methods.
_	but, subject to the proviso that:
_	Sharky won the game and with it his freedom, but with the proviso that Lockhart would at some future date, have an opportunity to play him once again.
_	This agreement brought the island squarely under British law, with the proviso that it would take into account Malay customs, traditions and religious practices, "where they shall not be contrary to reason, justice or humanity."
_	The owners of lots fronting on the beach were granted lifetime leasebacks with the proviso that the property would revert to the National Lakeshore; many of these houses have since been demolished.
_	Back at his office in London, Mr. Grewgious gives Edwin a ring which Rosa's father had given to her mother, with the proviso that Edwin must either give the ring to Rosa as a sign of his irrevocable commitment to her or return it to Mr. Grewgious.
_	old Shute House was retained by Sir John Carew-Pole until 1955 when he gave it to the National Trust on the proviso that members of his wider family would remain tenants, which they did until 2008.
_	He was released on harsh terms, including the proviso that all ships coming into Cyprus land in now Genoese Famagusta.
_	The law applied to architecture and pieces of art relating to an architectural structure, with the proviso that historic uniqueness and exceptional quality were to be established (article 2).
_	The STAIF-II conference has continued through 2017 as an annual event, now sponsored by a dedicated non-profit organization, with a stated objective to "sit on the boundary between established science and speculative science," with the proviso that "Speculation must be based upon fundamental scientific principles."
_	At the time, all locomotives that had been preserved were solely for use on heritage railways or for static display, and as the NZR sold locomotives on the proviso that they would never again run on the NZR network, it was a radical concept.
_	He began work on a new album in collaboration with musician and arranger Alastair Gavin, as well as David Motion (who had produced "The Circle & the Square"), under the proviso that the 'tribal' elements which contributed so strongly to the sound of the earlier record be toned down.
_	As of April 2014, Saudi authorities in the education ministry have been asked by the Shoura Council to consider lifting a state school ban on sports for girls with the proviso that any sports conform to Sharia rules on dress and gender segregation, according to the official SPA news agency.
_	This property was acquired in 1580 and in 1584 was let with the proviso that any unroofed buildings might be pulled down whenever required.
_	Ludendorff screeched at him until François finally agreed to attack, but with the proviso that because his ammunition column was still on the road, his men must charge with bayonets.
_	On a second review by the Committee, the film was rated not suitable for children under 16 on the proviso that the scene in which Alde and Lea hug each other in bed is removed.
_	Intermarriages between Jews and Christians being allowed in the grand duchy, Hess officially consecrated such nuptials, notwithstanding the proviso that the off-spring should be brought up in the Christian faith.
_	These funds came through the Marshall Plan and did not have to be repaid, however they carried the proviso that Britain modernize the management of its major corporations.
_	They accompanied them to ringside for the duration of their WWF World Tag Team Championship title match with the Hardy Boyz, assisting the Posse with the proviso that they would receive a title shot if the Posse was to win.
_	The request was granted on the proviso that "the correct spelling be adopted namely Windang, which is that of the Island and Trigonometrical Station thereon in the vicinity".
_	Dillon subsequently sold the majority of the company to the University of London in 1956, with the proviso that it used her name.
_	This enabled him to cancel his contract with Hearts in the third year of a four-year deal, with the proviso that he join a club in a foreign country and that sufficient notice be given to his former employers.
_	Though a congregation of bishops assembled at Paris in December 1761 recommended no action, Louis XV of France (1715–74) promulgated a royal order permitting the Society to remain in France, with the proviso that certain essentially liberalising changes in their institution satisfy the Parlement with a French Jesuit vicar-general who would be independent of the general in Rome.
_	Hitler was reluctant, but eventually agreed to Reitsch's request to establish and train a suicide attack air unit, with the proviso that it would not be operated in combat without his approval.
_	An additional eleven members are allocated by a London wide top-up vote with the proviso that parties must win at least five percent of the vote to qualify for the list seats.
_	The CRO series contained findings before they had been endorsed by the War Office to give unit commanders and training school Commandants quick access to information with the proviso that if the details contradicted accepted theory, this would usually take precedence.
_	The Chateau was listed in 1906, with later listings for the larger environment and sold to the state by Valentine Stapfer in 1933 on the proviso that the building and interiors remain intact.
_	Construction of this building in 1900-01 was funded by Benjamin Smith as a memorial to his parents, with the proviso that the town acquire the land.
_	The site of each General Chapter had been decided at the General Chapter the year before (with the proviso that emergency circumstances might allow the Master General to choose another site), and therefore John's itinerary every year would include the goal of reaching the chosen site at the appropriate time each Spring.
_	Leicester having returned to England, in February 1587 Elizabeth signed Mary's death warrant, with the proviso that it be not carried out until she gave her approval.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali inhabitants would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	Mr Grewgious gives Edwin a ring which Rosa's father had given to her mother, with the proviso that Edwin must either give the ring to Rosa as a sign of his irrevocable commitment to her or return it to him.
_	The contract for the car’s design again went to Frua of Moncalieri, with the proviso that as far as possible they should avoid the requirement to design new components where existing parts might be obtained from other manufacturers.
_	In 1989, a gift of $1000 was offered by the Queen City Optimists with the proviso that the organization start a performance group; after discussions initially centered on starting a drum line, Carolina Crown Drum and Bugle Corps was born.
_	In subsequent rounds, the teams are ranked in order of the number of VPs they have accumulated in previous rounds, and the top team plays the second team, the third team plays the fourth team, etc., subject to the proviso that teams do not play each other twice.
_	In 1109, Karbach had its first documentary mention of sorts when the Quintenach estate, which lay within what are now Karbach’s municipal limits, was mentioned along with another estate named Hirzenach in a document from Pope Paschal II when he donated them to the Siegburg Abbey with the proviso that a monastery be built there.
_	Civil certification was gained in 1956 under the auspices of the Civil Aeronautics Administration (CAA), and Taylor reached a deal with Ling-Temco-Vought for serial production on the proviso that he was able to attract 500 orders.
_	Oaklands station was opened in 1913, the land having been sold to the Government by T. C. Tait on the proviso that it be named after his once-extensive property.
_	With the autonomy (home-rule) law of 1948, Faroese was finally the language used in all affairs, with the proviso that Danish should always be taught in school so that all can use Danish to communicate with other Scandinavians.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali inhabitants would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	This enabled the library to receive its first public financial assistance, $100 in state aid, with the proviso that it be spent on the purchase of "approved" books.
_	Since 1996, the stone has been kept at Edinburgh Castle in Scotland on the proviso that it be returned to England for use at coronations.
_	Bennett, who by the time of this marriage had died, had left three daughters, and in his will had left them each £20,000, subject to their not marrying before the age of sixteen or without the consent of those he named, with the proviso that the legacy of a daughter doing so was to be reduced to £10,000.
_	Carnegie agreed to provide £3,500 in two stages for the construction of the library with the proviso that Sheffield Libraries Committee consented to spend no less than £230 per annum on its upkeep.
_	Morgan had bought the club for the nominal sum of £10, with the proviso that he invested £30 million into the club.
_	One also establishes that the state protects the rights and freedoms of its citizens, but contains the proviso that a citizen of Belarus ""bears a responsibility towards the State to discharge unwaveringly the duties imposed upon him by the Constitution.""
_	As was common at the time Felton offered Barry a return match but with the proviso that it was to be raced in Sydney.
_	Regarding the effort that took the film from inception to screening in seven months, Executive Producer Margaret Hyde said, "Everyone, especially Rev. Kyles, participated with the proviso that we didn't seek to personally benefit from the film and that all proceeds would go to the Museum.
_	Later in 1965, Major Oliver Smedley and Allan Crawford approached him again to go into partnership, on the proviso that they would provide a new transmitter.
_	Legendary film producer Irving Thalberg arranged for the play's backing through the support of Dr. A.H. Giannini of the Bank of America, with the proviso that a large portion of the production's profits would benefit Jewish refugees from Hitler's Germany.
_	Britain included the proviso that the Somali residents would retain their autonomy, but Ethiopia immediately claimed sovereignty over the area.
_	So polarization by reflection had been accounted for — but with the proviso that the direction of vibration in Fresnel's model was "perpendicular" to the plane of polarization as defined by Malus.
_	The most important feature of the agreement was that it granted freedom of action to the UK in Egypt and to France in Morocco (with the proviso that France's eventual dispositions for Morocco include reasonable allowance for Spain's interests there).
_	They sought a term covering the duration of the war plus six months, to which the Company was agreeable, on the proviso that the Company be able to terminate the agreement with six months notice if they decided to resume work on the tunnel and it was not required for “essential war purposes”.
_	The proposal to link the airport with a bridge had been previously approved by Toronto City Council in 1995 and 1998, with the proviso that a business plan would be presented for approval by the THC and later the TPA for operating the airport.
_	Two Free French parachute battalions had originally been assigned in early July, but disagreements over their deployment with General de Gaulle meant that the troops were not made available, and so the British 2nd Parachute Brigade was assigned to the operation on the proviso that they would be returned to operations in Italy once the beachhead was firmly established.
_	When Edward Stratford, 2nd Earl of Aldborough (Amelia's brother) died in 1801 he bequeathed the bulk of his estate to Amelia's grandson (his nephew, too junior to inherit the Powerscourt Viscountcy) on the proviso that he took back the Stratford name, thus becoming John Wingfield-Stratford in 1802.
_	In "The Problem of Metaphysics" (1974) MacKinnon develops a Kantian epistemology and comes close to an agnostic position on God, except for the proviso that ethical decision-making has the capacity to make agents aware of a kind of metaphysical realism.
_	The Tushinghams gave the land, where the house had stood, to the council, with the proviso that it was to be used to build a library for the community.
_	One week later, Operation Snake Eyes was authorized on the proviso that Souvanna Phouma, who was a Neutralist, come out as opposed to the Chinese road construction through the Kingdom.
_	Because of the vehemence of this quarrel, the New York Legislature passed the Maclay Act in 1842, giving New York City an elective Board of Education empowered to build and supervise schools and distribute the education fund—but with the proviso that none of the money should go to schools which taught religion.
_	Bake accepts on the proviso that Sherry asks him to marry her.
